Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3572
Hospital districts; bonds; new; vote of electors not required.

The issuance of such new bonds shall not require a vote of the people to authorize such issue, and such bonds shall be paid, and the levy be made and tax collected for their payment, in accordance with laws governing the bonds which they are issued to replace.

Laws 1967, c. 109, § 19, p. 357;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.67.